Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB539.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 57A12(b)(1) of Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 57A12. Transportation network company drivers.* * *(b) Driver qualification requirements.--(1) No transportation network company shall engage any person as a transportation network company driver unless the transportation network company ascertains that the person:(i) possesses and has possessed a valid State driver's license or a valid driver's license of another state, district or territory of the United States for at 12345678910111213141516171819 least one year prior to applying to become a transportation network company driver;(ii) is at least 21 years of age;(iii) has not had more than three moving violations or a major violation in the immediately preceding three-year period; [and](iv) has not had a limousine or taxi driver certificate suspended or revoked by the authority due to a regulatory violation within the five years immediately preceding his application to be a transportation network company driver. The authority shall make a list of all the drivers available to a transportation network company upon request. The suspension or revocation of a license by the authority because a driver was operating as a transportation network company driver prior to the effective date of this section shall not constitute grounds for disqualification under this subsection[.]; and(v) is a resident of Pennsylvania.* * *Section 2. Section 2605(b) of Title 66 is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 2605. Transportation network company drivers.* * *(b) Requirements for transportation network company drivers.--A transportation network company driver must:* * *(3.1) For purposes of providing prearranged rides originating within this Commonwealth, be a resident of Pennsylvania.20250SB0539PN0525 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0539PN0525 - 3 - 12